Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.005

Deputy director—Appointment—Powers and duties.

The director of agriculture may appoint a deputy director who shall assist the director in the administration of the affairs of the department and who shall have charge and general supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the director, and who, in case a vacancy occurs in the office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a director is appointed and qualified, or the governor appoints an acting director.

[ 1983 c 248 s 2; 1967 c 240 s 14.]